Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 5. REGULATION OF BUSINESSES AND SERVICES

SUBTITLE C. BUSINESS OPERATIONS

CHAPTER 120. SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 120.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Social media platform" means an Internet website or application that is open to the public, allows a user to create an account, and enables users to communicate with other users for the primary purpose of posting information, comments, messages, or images. The term does not include:

(A) an Internet service provider as defined by Section 324.055;

(B) electronic mail; or

(C) an online service, application, or website:

(i) that consists primarily of news, sports, entertainment, or other information or content that is not user generated but is preselected by the provider; and

(ii) for which any chat, comments, or interactive functionality is incidental to, directly related to, or dependent on the provision of the content described by Subparagraph (i).

(2) "User" means a person who posts, uploads, transmits, shares, or otherwise publishes or receives content through a social media platform. The term includes a person who has a social media platform account that the social media platform has disabled or locked.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. (a) This chapter applies only to a user who:

(1) resides in this state;

(2) does business in this state; or

(3) shares or receives content on a social media platform in this state.

(b) This chapter applies only to a social media platform that functionally has more than 50 million active users in the United States in a calendar month.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.003. CONSTRUCTION OF CHAPTER. This chapter may not be construed to limit or expand intellectual property law.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 120.051. PUBLIC DISCLOSURES. (a) A social media platform shall, in accordance with this subchapter, publicly disclose accurate information regarding its content management, data management, and business practices, including specific information regarding the manner in which the social media platform:

(1) curates and targets content to users;

(2) places and promotes content, services, and products, including its own content, services, and products;

(3) moderates content;

(4) uses search, ranking, or other algorithms or procedures that determine results on the platform; and

(5) provides users' performance data on the use of the platform and its products and services.

(b) The disclosure required by Subsection (a) must be sufficient to enable users to make an informed choice regarding the purchase of or use of access to or services from the platform.

(c) A social media platform shall publish the disclosure required by Subsection (a) on an Internet website that is easily accessible by the public.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.052. ACCEPTABLE USE POLICY. (a) A social media platform shall publish an acceptable use policy in a location that is easily accessible to a user.

(b) A social media platform's acceptable use policy must:

(1) reasonably inform users about the types of content allowed on the social media platform;

(2) explain the steps the social media platform will take to ensure content complies with the policy;

(3) explain the means by which users can notify the social media platform of content that potentially violates the acceptable use policy, illegal content, or illegal activity, which includes:

(A) an e-mail address or relevant complaint intake mechanism to handle user complaints; and

(B) a complaint system described by Subchapter C; and

(4) include publication of a biannual transparency report outlining actions taken to enforce the policy.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.053. BIANNUAL TRANSPARENCY REPORT. (a) As part of a social media platform's acceptable use policy under Section 120.052, the social media platform shall publish a biannual transparency report that includes, with respect to the preceding six-month period:

(1) the total number of instances in which the social media platform was alerted to illegal content, illegal activity, or potentially policy-violating content by:

(A) a user complaint;

(B) an employee of or person contracting with the social media platform; or

(C) an internal automated detection tool;

(2) subject to Subsection (b), the number of instances in which the social media platform took action with respect to illegal content, illegal activity, or potentially policy-violating content known to the platform due to the nature of the content as illegal content, illegal activity, or potentially policy-violating content, including:

(A) content removal;

(B) content demonetization;

(C) content deprioritization;

(D) the addition of an assessment to content;

(E) account suspension;

(F) account removal; or

(G) any other action taken in accordance with the platform's acceptable use policy;

(3) the country of the user who provided the content for each instance described by Subdivision (2);

(4) the number of coordinated campaigns, if applicable;

(5) the number of instances in which a user appealed the decision to remove the user's potentially policy-violating content;

(6) the percentage of appeals described by Subdivision (5) that resulted in the restoration of content; and

(7) a description of each tool, practice, action, or technique used in enforcing the acceptable use policy.

(b) The information described by Subsection (a)(2) must be categorized by:

(1) the rule violated; and

(2) the source for the alert of illegal content, illegal activity, or potentially policy-violating content, including:

(A) a government;

(B) a user;

(C) an internal automated detection tool;

(D) coordination with other social media platforms; or

(E) persons employed by or contracting with the platform.

(c) A social media platform shall publish the information described by Subsection (a) with an open license, in a machine-readable and open format, and in a location that is easily accessible to users.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. COMPLAINT PROCEDURES

Sec. 120.101. COMPLAINT SYSTEM. A social media platform shall provide an easily accessible complaint system to enable a user to submit a complaint in good faith and track the status of the complaint, including a complaint regarding:

(1) illegal content or activity; or

(2) a decision made by the social media platform to remove content posted by the user.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.102. PROCESSING OF COMPLAINTS. A social media platform that receives notice of illegal content or illegal activity on the social media platform shall make a good faith effort to evaluate the legality of the content or activity within 48 hours of receiving the notice, excluding hours during a Saturday or Sunday and subject to reasonable exceptions based on concerns about the legitimacy of the notice.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.103. REMOVAL OF CONTENT; EXCEPTIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), if a social media platform removes content based on a violation of the platform's acceptable use policy under Section 120.052, the social media platform shall, concurrently with the removal:

(1) notify the user who provided the content of the removal and explain the reason the content was removed;

(2) allow the user to appeal the decision to remove the content to the platform; and

(3) provide written notice to the user who provided the content of:

(A) the determination regarding an appeal requested under Subdivision (2); and

(B) in the case of a reversal of the social media platform's decision to remove the content, the reason for the reversal.

(b) A social media platform is not required to provide a user with notice or an opportunity to appeal under Subsection (a) if the social media platform:

(1) is unable to contact the user after taking reasonable steps to make contact; or

(2) knows that the potentially policy-violating content relates to an ongoing law enforcement investigation.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 120.104. APPEAL PROCEDURES. If a social media platform receives a user complaint on the social media platform's removal from the platform of content provided by the user that the user believes was not potentially policy-violating content, the social media platform shall, not later than the 14th day, excluding Saturdays and Sundays, after the date the platform receives the complaint:

(1) review the content;

(2) determine whether the content adheres to the platform's acceptable use policy;

(3) take appropriate steps based on the determination under Subdivision (2); and

(4) notify the user regarding the determination made under Subdivision (2) and the steps taken under Subdivision (3).

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER D. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 120.151. ACTION BY ATTORNEY GENERAL. (a) The attorney general may bring an action against a social media platform to enjoin a violation of this chapter.

(b) If an injunction is granted in an action brought under Subsection (a), the attorney general may recover costs incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorney's fees and reasonable investigative costs.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 20), Sec. 2, eff. December 2, 2021.